Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.386 and 2024 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning July 1, 2024, an eligible commissioned employee completing 26 or more years of service shall qualify for an annual state trooper longevity bonus of $15,000 on the employee's anniversary date of state employment, which shall be paid in four equal quarterly payments.(2) An eligible commissioned employee who completed 26 or more years of service before July 1, 2024, and who has been continuously employed by the Washington state patrol for at least one year as of the effective date of this section qualifies for a one-time retention incentive. The incentive is equal to $3,750 multiplied by the result when one is subtracted from the number of the fiscal quarter in which the employee's anniversary date falls. The one-time retention incentive shall be completed no later than June 30, 2025.(3) The establishment of the state trooper longevity bonus is subject to a change to the applicable collective bargaining agreements negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representatives.(((3)))(4) This section does not interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of the officers of the Washington state patrol to bargain collectively with the state through the exclusive bargaining representatives as provided for in RCW 41.56.473.(((4)))(5) The state patrol longevity bonus created in this section is a time-limited incentive targeted at retaining senior personnel and is not intended to be included in salary or average final salary for calculation of pension benefits in this chapter.(((5)))(6) The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 237, Laws of 2024 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time.(((6)))(7) Beginning July 15, 2024, and every three months thereafter, the Washington state patrol must submit a report showing the average filled positions in field force trooper positions in comparison to the 683 total authorized field force trooper positions in the prior fiscal quarter. The quarterly reports detailed must be submitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The authorized field force trooper level as the basis for this comparison may be adjusted as specified in the omnibus transportation appropriations act.(((7)))(8) For the purposes of this section((, "eligible)):(a) "Eligible commissioned employee" means a Washington state patrol employee with 26 or more years of service in the Washington state patrol retirement system.(((8)))(b) "Number of the fiscal quarter" equals:(i) One, if the employee's anniversary date falls between July 1st and September 30th, inclusive;(ii) Two, if the employee's anniversary date falls between October 1st and December 31st, inclusive;(iii) Three, if the employee's anniversary date falls between January 1st and March 31st, inclusive; and(iv) Four, if the employee's anniversary date falls between April 1st and June 30th, inclusive.(9) This section expires June 30, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---